Missouri, session 2026, SB1252.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 307.175, RSMo, is repealed and one new
section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section 307.175,
to read as follows:
307.175. 1. Motor vehicles and equipment which are
operated by any member of an organized fire department,
ambulance association, or rescue squad, including a canine
search and rescue team, whether paid or volunteer, may be
operated on streets and highways in this state as an
emergency vehicle under the provisions of section 304.022
while responding to a fire call [or], ambulance call, or an
emergency call requiring search and rescue operations, or at
the scene of a fire call [or], ambulance call, or an
emergency call requiring search and rescue operations, and
while using or sounding a warning siren and using or
displaying thereon fixed, flashing or rotating blue lights,
but sirens and blue lights shall be used only in bona fide
emergencies.
2. (1) Notwithstanding subsection 1 of this section,
the following vehicles may use or display fixed, flashing,
or rotating red or red and blue lights:
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1252 2
(a) Emergency vehicles, as defined in section 304.022,
when responding to an emergency;
(b) Vehicles operated as described in subsection 1 of
this section;
(c) Vehicles and equipment owned or leased by a
contractor or subcontractor performing work for the
department of transportation, except that the red or red and
blue lights shall be displayed on vehicles or equipment
described in this paragraph only between dusk and dawn, when
such vehicles or equipment are stationary, such vehicles or
equipment are located in a work zone as defined in section
304.580, highway workers as defined in section 304.580 are
present, and such work zone is designated by a sign or
signs. No more than two vehicles or pieces of equipment in
a work zone may display fixed, flashing, or rotating lights
under this subdivision;
(d) Vehicles and equipment owned, leased, or operated
by a coroner, medical examiner, or forensic investigator of
the county medical examiner's office or a similar entity,
when responding to a crime scene, motor vehicle accident,
workplace accident, or any location at which the services of
such professionals have been requested by a law enforcement
officer.
(2) The following vehicles and equipment may use or
display fixed, flashing, or rotating amber or amber and
white lights:
(a) Vehicles and equipment owned or leased by the
state highways and transportation commission and operated by
an authorized employee of the department of transportation;
(b) Vehicles and equipment owned or leased by a
contractor or subcontractor performing work for the
department of transportation, except that the amber or amber

SB 1252 3
and white lights shall be displayed on vehicles described in
this paragraph only when such vehicles or equipment are
located in a work zone as defined in section 304.580,
highway workers as defined in section 304.580 are present,
and such work zone is designated by a sign or signs;
(c) Vehicles and equipment operated by a utility
worker performing work for the utility, except that the
amber or amber and white lights shall be displayed on
vehicles described in this paragraph only when such vehicles
are stationary, such vehicles or equipment are located in a
work zone as defined in section 304.580, a utility worker is
present, and such work zone is designated by a sign or
signs. As used in this paragraph, the term "utility worker"
means any employee while in performance of his or her job
duties, including any person employed under contract of a
utility that provides gas, heat, electricity, water, steam,
telecommunications or cable services, or sewer services,
whether privately, municipally, or cooperatively owned.
3. Permits for the operation of such vehicles equipped
with sirens or blue lights shall be in writing and shall be
issued and may be revoked by the chief of an organized fire
department, organized ambulance association, rescue squad,
or the state highways and transportation commission and no
person shall use or display a siren or blue lights on a
motor vehicle, fire, ambulance, or rescue equipment without
a valid permit authorizing the use. A permit to use a siren
or lights as heretofore set out does not relieve the
operator of the vehicle so equipped with complying with all
other traffic laws and regulations. Violation of this
section constitutes a class A misdemeanor.
✓